California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(3) A mental health plan does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, national origin, ancestry, religion, sex, marital status, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, age, or disability.

(4) The availability of the grievance procedure and how to file a grievance, including identification of, and contact information for, the designated mental health plan representative.

(5) How to file a discrimination complaint with the United States Department of Health and Human Services Office for Civil Rights if there is a concern of discrimination based on race, color, national origin, age, disability, or sex.

(b) Written notice of the availability of free language assistance services shall be provided in
 English and in the top 15 languages spoken by LEP individuals in California, as determined by the department, and consistent with the requirements identified in Part 92 of Title 45 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 1557 of the federal Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 18116).

(c) (1) The information described in subdivisions (a) and (b) shall be provided in the following manner:

(A) In the beneficiary handbook.

(B) Posted in conspicuous physical locations where the mental health plan interacts with the public.

(C) On the internet website published and maintained by the mental health plan, in a manner that allows beneficiaries, prospective beneficiaries, and members of the public to easily
 locate the information.

(2) To the extent the information described in subdivisions (a) and (b) is not included in existing informational notices, a mental health plan shall add this information at the time of the next regularly scheduled update of the applicable publication.

(d) Oral interpretation services shall be provided to an LEP beneficiary by an interpreter that, at a minimum, meets all of the following qualifications:

(1) Demonstrated proficiency in speaking and understanding both English and the language spoken by the LEP beneficiary.

(2) The ability to interpret effectively, accurately, and impartially, both receptively and expressly, to and from the language spoken by the LEP beneficiary and English, using any necessary specialized
 vocabulary, terminology, and phraseology.

(3) Adherence to generally accepted interpreter ethics principles, including client confidentiality.

(e) A mental health plan shall not require an LEP beneficiary to provide the beneficiary’s own interpreter or rely on a staff member who does not meet the qualifications described in subdivision (d) to communicate directly with the LEP beneficiary.

(f) A mental health plan shall not rely on an adult or minor child accompanying the LEP beneficiary to interpret or facilitate communication except under either of the following circumstances:

(1) In an emergency, as defined by the department, and an interpreter who meets the qualifications described in subdivision (d) is not immediately available for the LEP
 beneficiary.

(2) If the LEP beneficiary specifically requests that the accompanying adult interpret or facilitate communication, the accompanying adult agrees to provide that assistance, and reliance on that accompanying adult for that assistance is appropriate under the circumstances.

(g) This section shall be implemented only to the extent that federal financial participation is available and is not otherwise jeopardized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 322.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Conditionally inoperative as provided in Section 14721.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Financial Provisions [15000. - 15207.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [15000. - 15001.]

15000.

Notwithstanding any provisions of Sections 29800 and 29805 of the Government Code, warrants payable to recipients of public assistance shall not include any word or abbreviation indicative of aid, assistance, charity, needy, support, or welfare. Nothing in this section prohibits the use of code numbers or other code symbols used and understood by county officers and agencies to identify the purpose and liability for which such warrants are drawn, if such code numbers or other code symbols are not generally so understood by the public.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

15001.

Any warrant issued in payment of aid under this division is subject to the provisions of Section 29802 of the Government Code. Each such warrant shall bear on its face a statement that the warrant shall be void if not presented to the county treasurer for payment within six months after the date of issuance thereof.

The provision for a substitute warrant shall also apply to the assignee of a warrant, or the legal representative or heir of a deceased recipient, in accordance with the provisions of Section 12158 of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1041.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Social Welfare Federal Fund [15050.5. - 15050.5.]

15050.5.

All references in this division or in any other provision of law to the Social Welfare Federal Fund shall be deemed references to the Federal Trust Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 235, Sec. 4.   Operative July 1, 1985, by Sec. 16 of Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Welfare Advance Fund [15100. - 15100.]

15100.

A revolving fund in the State Treasury is hereby created to be known as the Welfare Advance Fund. All moneys in the fund are appropriated for the purpose of making payments or advances to counties, Indian tribes, the federal Social Security Administration, or other federal, state, or governmental entities, of the state and federal shares of local assistance programs, and for the payment of refunds. In addition, the fund may be used for the purpose of making a consolidated payment, comprised of the state and federal shares of local assistance costs, to any payee associated with programs administered by the State Department of Social Services.

Payments or advances of funds to counties, Indian tribes, the federal Social Security Administration, or other federal, state, or governmental entities, or to any payee, which payments or advances are properly chargeable to appropriations made from other funds in the State Treasury, may be made by Controller’s warrant drawn against the Welfare Advance Fund. For every warrant so issued, the several purposes and amounts for which it was drawn shall be identified for the payee.

The amounts to be transferred to the Welfare Advance Fund at any time shall be determined by the department, and, upon order of the Controller, shall be transferred from the funds and appropriations otherwise properly chargeable therewith to the Welfare Advance Fund.

Refunds of amounts disbursed from the Welfare Advance Fund shall, on order of the Controller, be deposited in the Welfare Advance Fund, and, on order of the Controller, shall be transferred therefrom to the funds and appropriations from which the amounts were originally derived. Claims for amounts erroneously paid into the Welfare Advance Fund shall be submitted by the department to the Controller who, if he or she approves the claims, shall draw his or her warrant in payment thereof against the Welfare Advance Fund.

All amounts increasing the cash balance in the Welfare Advance Fund, which were derived from the cancellation of warrants issued therefrom, shall, on order of the Controller, be transferred to and in augmentation of the appropriations from which the amounts were originally derived.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 323, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3.5. Central Benefit Issuance Fund [15125. - 15126.]

15125.

(a) The Central Benefit Issuance Fund is hereby created in the State Treasury.

(b) The fund shall be administered by the State Department of Social Services, and, notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the department, without regard to fiscal years, for expenditure for the purpose of making payments or advances to recipients of public social services and CalFresh benefits, as provided in Section 11006.6.

(c) Amounts to be transferred to the Central Benefit Issuance Fund shall be determined by the department, in accordance with an agreed upon
 format with the Controller, from the funds and appropriations properly chargeable for the implementation of the central benefit issuance system provided for in Section 11006.6.

(d) (1) Notwithstanding Section 17070 of the Government Code, any warrant drawn on the Central Benefit Issuance Fund that remains unpaid for 180 days after it becomes payable, shall be void and shall be canceled by the Controller.

(2) The Controller shall cause to be printed prominently on the face of each warrant issued from the fund, a notice regarding the requirements of paragraph (1).

(e) Notwithstanding Sections 17091 and 17092 of the Government Code, the department, with the concurrence of the Controller, shall provide for the replacement of lost or stolen warrants consistent with Section 29853.5 of the Government
 Code. The department may adopt regulations implementing this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 227, Sec. 63.   (AB 1400)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

15126.

Counties participating in the central benefit issuance system, pursuant to Section 11006.6, shall pay to the department, at regular intervals as determined by the department, the share of public social services costs otherwise attributable to local government. Failure to pay within the determined intervals shall result in offsetting the appropriate amount from any funds going to the county from the state. Counties shall remit their share of public social services costs directly to the state, in accordance with an agreed upon format with the Controller, for deposit to the Central Benefit Issuance Fund or where deemed appropriate by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 696, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Payment of State and Federal Funds to Counties for Public Assistance Programs [15150. - 15154.]

15150.

During such time as grants-in-aid are provided or made available by the United States government for public assistance in this state, the State Treasurer shall pay to each county from the sums so granted (1) an amount which shall be used exclusively as public assistance equal to the full amount of any sums received from the United States government as public assistance in respect to recipients within the provisions of this chapter maintained or supported by the county; and (2) an additional amount equal to such county’s proportionate share of any amount so granted or made available to this state by the United States government for the costs of administering such aid, which additional amount shall be used exclusively for paying such administration costs. The department shall determine the portion of the amount so granted or made available for administration costs to be paid to the counties, which portion for each county shall bear the same proportion to the total amount made available to this state for such administrative costs that the administrative costs of that county bear to the total administrative costs of all counties and of the state. The department shall adopt rules and regulations which shall be of uniform application for determining the proportionate shares for such quarter to each county under the provisions of this section and Section 15152.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.   Note: Provision (2) is superseded by Section 15151 whenever that section is operative.)
-------------------------------------------

15150.5.

The director shall develop and implement an allocation formula for state funds and state administered federal funds that each county is to receive for social services. The director shall seek the advice and assistance of counties in development of this formula. The proposed formula shall become effective not sooner than 30 days after it has been submitted to the chairman of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. The proposed formula submitted to the chairman shall be accompanied by a statement from the County Supervisors Association of California which expresses the counties’ position on the formula.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 883, Sec. 4.   Effective September 19, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 6 of Ch. 883.)
-------------------------------------------

15151.

During the times that grants-in-aid are provided or made available by the United States government for the purpose of defraying any portion of the costs of administration incurred for public assistance, the State Treasurer shall pay to each county an amount equal to the county’s proportionate share of the sum so granted for the cost of administration, which amount shall be used exclusively for paying the administrative costs. Except as provided in Section 15151.5, the department shall determine the portion of the amount so granted or made available for administrative costs to be paid to the counties, which portion shall be determined pursuant to rules and regulations of the department and shall be not less than one-half of the amount so granted or made available. The
 department shall adopt rules and regulations that shall be of uniform application for determining the proportionate shares of the respective counties of the portion so determined to be paid to those counties.

This section shall become operative and shall supersede provision (2) of Section 15150 during the times that grants by the United States government, provided or made available to defray any portion of administrative costs incurred for public assistance, are not computed as a proportion of those costs of administration. Whenever this section is in effect, all other sections referring to Section 15150 shall also be deemed to refer to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 303, Sec. 623.   (AB 731)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section conditionally operative as prescribed by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

15151.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (2) of Section 15150 and Section 15151, the counties shall receive at least 66 percent of the amounts payable to the state with respect to the services subject to the limitations of Title XX of the Social Security Act, provided:

(a) That the total federal allocation of funds for social services under the public assistance programs shall be fully distributed and utilized in each fiscal year;

(b) That in the event that federal funds so allocated have not been utilized, the department shall reallocate the unused funds in such a manner that they may be fully utilized for the purposes for which they are received.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 714, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

15152.

From the sums appropriated therefor by the State of California, the State Treasurer shall pay to each county an additional amount, which shall be used exclusively for public assistance, equal to that proportion of the aid grants paid by the county under each public assistance program as is specified in the appropriation for that program, after deducting from the sums so expended the amount paid to the county under subdivision (1) of Section 15150 of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------

15153.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other section of this code, the method of computing and advancing funds to counties, both as to state funds and funds made available by the United States government, shall be as follows:

(a) The department, prior to the beginning of each month, shall estimate the amount to be paid for the month to each county under this part.

(b) The department shall then certify to the Controller the amounts so estimated by it for each county, adjusted by any sum by which it finds that its estimate for any prior period was greater or less than the amount which should have been paid.

(c) The Controller shall thereupon draw the necessary warrants, and prior to audit or settlement by the department and the Controller, the State Treasurer shall pay to the treasurer of each county the amount so certified.

(d) Moneys may be advanced by or on behalf of any county to a corporation or association in accordance with the provisions of a contract executed between the county and the corporation or association pursuant to Section 14052 or 14556.

(e) The monthly advance of state general funds to counties for benefits or aid grants, administration, and for employment and supportive services, shall be temporarily suspended for the months of July and August 2008. This suspension shall not apply to a county with a population of less than 40,000. The advance of funds for these two months shall resume on September 1, 2008. In addition to the advance for the month of September, counties shall be paid for the advances that would have been made in July and August 2008 no later than September 30, 2008. Advances for the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program for the Aged, Blind and Disabled (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000)) and the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3) shall not be affected by this temporary suspension.

(f) (1) The monthly advance of state general funds to counties for benefits or aid grants, administration, and for employment and supportive services, shall be temporarily suspended for the months of July and August 2009.

(2) This suspension made pursuant to this subdivision shall not apply to a county with a population of less than 40,000 persons.

(3) The advance of funds for the months specified in paragraph (1) shall resume on September 1, 2009.

(4) In addition to the advance for the month of September, a county shall be paid for the advances that would have been made in the months of July and August 2009, no later than September 30, 2009.

(5) Advances for the Supplemental Security Income/State Supplementary Payment Program for the Aged, Blind and Disabled (Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000)) and the In-Home Supportive Services program (Article 7 (commencing with Section 12300) of Chapter 3) shall not be affected by the temporary suspension made pursuant to this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 3rd Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 25.   Effective February 20, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

15153.5.

Notwithstanding any provision of this article to the contrary, state and federal funds normally due counties for aid payments in behalf of appropriate participants under work incentive programs administered by the Employment Development Department, and the families of such participants, shall be transferred by the Controller to the Employment Development Department for use in administering the work incentive program. In addition, an amount of money not in excess of the county share of such aid payments shall be determined and deducted from advances of state and federal funds due counties pursuant to Section 15153.

The State Department of Social Services and the Employment Development Department, subject to the approval of the Director of Finance and the Controller, shall establish procedures and methods for the maintenance of information and accounts and the preparation of reports essential to meet federal requirements, and to provide the Controller with financial statements to support the required transfer of funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

15154.

Reports of amounts paid out for public assistance shall be presented by the respective counties at times and in the form prescribed by the department. Such reports shall be audited by the department and the State Controller, and, when and in the amount approved, shall be allowed to the county as a credit to apply against advances made under the terms of Section 15153.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1784.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Appropriations for Public Assistance [15200. - 15207.]

15200.

There is hereby appropriated out of any money in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated the following sums:

(a) To each county for the support and maintenance of needy children, the sums specified in subdivisions (a), (e), and (f) of Section 11450, after subtracting all the following amounts:

(1) (A) Except as described in subparagraph (B), a 2.5-percent county share of cost.

(B) If Section 1613 of Title 8 of the United States Code applies, a 5-percent county share of cost.

(C) The county share described in this paragraph shall not apply to increases in maximum aid
 payments made in accordance with Section 11450.025.

(2) Federal funds utilized for this purpose.

(3) The amount allocated to each county from the Family Support Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.75.

(4) The amount allocated to each county from the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.50.

(5) The amount allocated to each county from the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.25.

(b) To each county for the support and maintenance of pregnant mothers, the sums specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 11450 after subtracting all of the following amounts:

(1) (A) Except as described in subparagraph (B), a 2.5-percent county share of cost.

(B) If Section 1613 of Title 8 of the United States Code applies, a 5-percent county share of cost.

(C) The county share described in this paragraph shall not apply to increases in maximum aid payments made in accordance with Section 11450.025.

(2) Federal funds utilized for this purpose.

(3) The amount allocated to each county from the Family Support Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.75.

(4) The amount allocated to each county from the Child Poverty and Family Supplemental Support Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.50.

(5) The amount allocated to each county from the CalWORKs Maintenance of Effort Subaccount pursuant to Section 17601.25.

(c) After deducting federal funds available for the adequate care of each child pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11450, as follows:

(1) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year, an amount equal to 40 percent of the sum necessary for the adequate care of each child.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this subdivision shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(d) (1) Prior to the 2011–12 fiscal year for each county for the support and care of children who are eligible for financial assistance under the Adoption Assistance Program, and after deducting federal funds available, 75 percent of the nonfederal share of the amount specified in Section 16121.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), beginning in the 2011–12 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, funding and expenditures for programs and activities under this subdivision shall be in accordance with the requirements provided in Sections 30025 and 30026.5 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 967, Sec. 2.   (AB 2466)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

15200.05.

(a) Federal block grant funds received for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program pursuant to subtitle A (commencing with Section 401) of Title IV of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 601 et seq.) may be deposited in, and shall be administered through, the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund, which is hereby created in the State Treasury. Upon authorization by the Director of Finance, special accounts may be established within this fund, and the fund may be used in accounting for any federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant funds received from the federal government after August 22, 1996.

(b) A fund condition statement for the federal block grant received for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program shall be provided to the Department of Finance with the estimates submitted pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10614 whether or not the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families Fund created by this section is used for the deposit and administration of those moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 108, Sec. 48.   Effective July 10, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

15200.4.

(a) In administering the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program provided for under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200), excluding provisions relating to foster care, the director may impose sanctions as provided by this section to assure adequate county administration performance. Fiscal sanctions may be imposed against a county only if the department has conducted, within the county, a statistically reliable and valid case sample with a confidence level of at least 95 percent.

(b) The director may hold counties financially liable for aid paid to ineligible persons and aid paid to eligible persons in excess of the amount to which they are entitled as represented by a dollar error rate. There shall be established annually in the Budget Act a dollar error rate standard which shall be the basis for computing a county’s liability under this section for the two subsequent quality control review periods for which error rates are generated. Counties which exceed the standard during the sanction period may be apportioned a sanction no greater than the state share of the Aid to Families with Dependent Children program payments multiplied by the amount by which the statistical measure of the lower point estimate of their error rate exceeded the standard.

(c) If a federal fiscal sanction is imposed against the state as a result of the state’s dollar error rate being above the federally established tolerance level, the director shall pass the sanction on to the counties in accordance with regulations adopted by the director which establish a method for equitable distribution of the sanction. The amount assessed to any county may be reduced or set aside if the director finds that extenuating circumstances existed and that imposition of the full sanction amount would unfairly penalize the county.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1025, Sec. 1.   Effective September 14, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

15200.5.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (c) of Section 15200, the county shall be responsible for 100 percent of the nonfederal share of payments to needy children eligible for AFDC-FC under the conditions of Section 11402.5, and for payments made to foster parents pursuant to Section 11410.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 845, Sec. 2.   Effective September 28, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

15201.

There is hereby continuously appropriated out of any moneys in the State Treasury not otherwise appropriated to the department for allocation to the Secretary of the Department of Health, Education and Welfare for payment of an amount equal to the amount of any grants made by the secretary as supplemental payments to aged, blind or disabled persons under the provisions of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of this part, less amounts payable by the federal government pursuant to Section 401 of Title IV of the Social Security Act Amendments of 1972.

The amendment of this section by Chapter 871 of the Statutes of 1974 does not constitute a change in, but is declaratory of, the preexisting law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1976, Ch. 504.)
-------------------------------------------

15203.

The state shall pay for an amount equal to the amount of any grant made by the county for blind persons who come within the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 13000) of this part by any appropriation therefor in the Budget Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 512.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.1.

Commencing on June 1, 1973, the state shall pay, in addition to its share of costs of public assistance under Sections 15200 and 15203, an amount equal to 100 percent of the nonfederal share of increases in grants made pursuant to Section 11006.1 and pursuant to the amendments to Section 11450 made during the 1972 Regular Session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 1216.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.15.

To the extent permitted by federal law and upon authorization pursuant to statute, including the annual Budget Act, the Director of Finance may transfer moneys in the Federal Trust Fund derived from the federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families block grant for augmentation of moneys received pursuant to the federal Child Care and Development Block Grant and the block grant provided for pursuant to Title XX of the federal Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1397). The transfer may be made not sooner than 30 days after notification, in writing, to the chairperson of the committee in each house of the Legislature that considers appropriations and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or his or her designee may, in each instance, determine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 606, Sec. 48.   Effective October 3, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.2.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual Budget Act appropriate state and federal funds in a single allocation to counties for the support of administrative activities undertaken by the counties to provide benefit payments to recipients of aid under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200) of Part 3 and to provide required work activities and supportive services in order to efficiently and effectively carry out the purposes of that chapter.

(b) (1) No later than 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act of 2004, the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall estimate the amount of unspent funds appropriated in the 2003–04 fiscal year single
 allocation described in this section.

(2) Unspent funds appropriated in the 2003–04 fiscal year single allocation, not to exceed forty million dollars ($40,000,000), shall be reappropriated to, and in augmentation of, Item 5180-101-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2004. The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop an allocation methodology for these funds. A planning allocation, based on the estimated amount of unspent funds and the agreed upon allocation methodology, shall be provided to the counties no later than 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act of 2004.

(c) (1) No later than 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act of 2005, the State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California,
 shall estimate the amount of unspent funds appropriated in the 2004-05 fiscal year single allocation described in this section.

(2) Unspent funds appropriated in the 2004–05 fiscal year single allocation, not to exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), shall be reappropriated to, and in augmentation of, Item 5180-101-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2005. The State Department of Social Services, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, shall develop an allocation methodology for these funds in order to partially offset the estimated savings due to the implementation of the quarterly reporting/prospective budgeting. A planning allocation, based on the estimated amount of unspent funds and the agreed upon allocation methodology, shall be provided to the counties no later than 30 days after the enactment of the Budget Act of 2005.

(d) The State Department of Social Services shall work with the County Welfare Directors Association of California, to determine the effect of implementation of the quarterly reporting/prospective budgeting system on eligibility activities and evaluate the impact on administrative costs.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), commencing with the 2021–22 fiscal year, and for each fiscal year thereafter, the funding provided for stage one childcare, as described in Article 15.5 (commencing with Section 8350) of Chapter 2 of Part 6 of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Education Code, shall be allocated to counties separately from the single allocation described in subdivision (a) for purposes of providing direct stage one childcare services and stage one childcare-related administration pursuant to Article 15.5 of the Education Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 11, Sec. 74.   (AB 79)   Effective June 29, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.3.

(a) Beginning in the 2000–01 fiscal year, allocation of funds provided under Section 15204.2 shall be made, in the case of funds for benefits administration and employment services, based on projected county costs and subject to funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for operating the CalWORKs program under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200). By November 1, 1999, the department and the County Welfare Directors Association shall jointly develop the specific components of this budgeting methodology, including a process for ensuring that costs funded under the methodology are reasonable and consistent with the requirements of this chapter. It is the intent of the Legislature that limited-term housing assistance be considered as part of the cost-based allocation methodology, where appropriate.

(b) Beginning in the 2002–03 fiscal year, funding in support of all components of the CalWORKs program and all state programs funded with federal Temporary Assistance for Needy Families funding shall be based on a budgeting methodology developed by the department in consultation with the counties, the California State Association of Counties, the County Welfare Directors Association, and other stakeholders, and subject to funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act for administration of the CalWORKs program under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200). In developing the new methodology, the department shall consider, among other factors, the availability of state and federal funds, projected caseload, and the need for basic supportive and employment services. The department shall submit the new methodology to the policy and fiscal committees of both houses of the Legislature by November 15, 2001.

(c) Beginning in the 2002–03 fiscal year, any adjustments to the county CalWORKs single allocations, determined pursuant to Section 15204.2, for funding overlaps pertaining to both United States Department of Labor Welfare-to-Work Grant funds and state matching funds, shall reflect the most recent available data regarding the expenditures of those funds that offset the funds that counties would have otherwise spent from the CalWORKs single allocations.

(d) In the 1997–98 fiscal year, additional funds for welfare-to-work administration above GAIN allocation in the 1996–97 fiscal year shall be distributed among the counties with two-thirds allocated to all counties based on each county’s share of adults aided under Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 11200). The remaining one-third shall be allocated among only those counties that in the prior year received an allocation per average aided adult at a level less than the statewide average, and shall be distributed among those counties so that they each receive the same overall allocation per average aided adult for welfare-to-work administration.

(e) For purposes of this section, and subject to funds appropriated in the annual Budget Act, no county shall receive less for employment services than what was received in the 1997–98 fiscal year allocation for welfare-to-work administration unless a county projects that its cost will be less than its 1997–98 fiscal year allocation for employment services.

(f) (1) In the 2001–02 fiscal year, the sum of three million five hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars ($3,587,000) in state matching funds for federal welfare-to-work block grant funds appropriated by Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2001 is for the purpose specified in paragraph (3).

(2) (A) No later than 30 days after the receipt of fourth-quarter claims submitted by counties in accordance with this section, the department shall determine the amount of unspent funds appropriated for the 2000–01 fiscal year for the CalWORKs single allocation and the CalWORKs mental health and substance abuse allocations. The department shall also determine the amount of those funds that were appropriated from the General Fund and the amount that was appropriated from the Federal Trust Fund.

(B) The amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) to have been appropriated from the General Fund shall be reappropriated to Item 5180-101-0001 of the Budget Act of 2001.

(C) The amount determined pursuant to subparagraph (A) to have been appropriated from the Federal Trust Fund shall be reappropriated to Item 5180-101-0890 of the Budget Act of 2001.

(3) No later than 60 days after the receipt of fourth-quarter claims, all funds appropriated to Item 5180-101-0001 and Item 5180-101-0890 of the Budget Act of 2001 pursuant to this subdivision shall be allocated to the counties that are under equity with respect to the single allocation (excluding child care and Cal-Learn) for the 2001–02 fiscal year, according to a methodology developed by the department, in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association.

(g) For the 2002–03 fiscal year only, the single allocation made pursuant to Section 15204.2 shall include an adjustment in the amount of one hundred twenty-eight million dollars ($128,000,000), from funds appropriated in Item 5180-101-0890, Schedule 16.30 (b) of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2002. The appropriated funds shall be allocated to counties for the 2002–03 fiscal year according to a methodology determined by the department in consultation with the County Welfare Directors Association.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1022, Sec. 50.   Effective September 28, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

15204.35.

(a) The State Department of Social Services shall work with representatives of county human services agencies and the County Welfare Directors Association of California to develop recommendations for revising the methodology used for development of the CalWORKs single allocation annual budget. As part of the process of developing these recommendations, the department shall consult with legislative staff, advocate representatives, and labor organizations that represent county workers.

(b) (1) Recommendations for initial changes to the methodology for development of the CalWORKs single allocation for the 2018–19 fiscal year shall be made to the Legislature by January 10, 2018.

(2) Recommendations for additional changes to the methodology for the 2019–20 and subsequent fiscal years shall be made to the Legislature by October 1, 2018.
